Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5686.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16d. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.81(5) Person E Domestic assault or assault of a pregnant individual with prior convictions 5 750.81a(3) Person E Aggravated domestic assault with prior convictions 5 750.81c(2) Person G Assault and battery of a department of health and human services employee or contractor causing physical injury 2 750.81c(3) Person E Assault and battery of a department of health and human services employee or contractor causing serious impairment of a body function 5 750.81d(1) Person G Assaulting, resisting, or obstructing certain persons 2 750.81d(2) Person F Assaulting, resisting, or obstructing certain persons causing bodily injury requiring medical attention 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.81d(3) Person C Assaulting, resisting, or obstructing certain persons causing serious impairment 15 750.81d(4) Person B Assaulting, resisting, or obstructing certain persons causing death 20 750.81e(2) Person G Assault on utility worker causing bodily injury requiring medical attention 2 750.81e(3) Person E Assault on utility worker causing serious impairment of a body function 5 750.81f(2) Person G Assault on a department of health and human services designated caregiver causing physical injury 2 750.81f(3) Person E Assault on a department of health and human services designated caregiver causing serious impairment of a body function 5 750.82(1) Person F Felonious assault 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.82(2) Person F Felonious assault ? weapon-free school zone 4 750.83 Person A Assault with intent to murder Life 750.84(1)(a) Person D Assault with intent to do great bodily harm less than murder 10 750.84(1)(b) Person D Assault by strangulation or suffocation 10 750.85 Person A Torture Life 750.86 Person D Assault with intent to maim 10 750.87 Person D Assault with intent to commit a felony 10 750.88 Person C Assault with intent to commit unarmed robbery 15 750.89 Person A Assault with intent to commit armed robbery Life 750.90(1) Person C Sexual contact under pretext of medical treatment 20 750.90(2) Person B Sexual penetration under pretext of medical treatment 25 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.90a Person A Assault against a pregnant individual causing miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus with intent or recklessness Life 750.90b(a) Person C Assault against a pregnant individual resulting in miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus 15 750.90b(b) Person D Assault against a pregnant individual resulting in great bodily harm to embryo or fetus 10 750.90c(a) Person C Gross negligence against a pregnant individual resulting in miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus 15 750.90c(b) Person E Gross negligence against a pregnant individual resulting in great bodily harm to embryo or fetus 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.90d(a) Person C Operating a vehicle under the influence or while impaired causing miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus 15 750.90d(b) Person E Operating a vehicle under the influence or while impaired causing serious or aggravated injury to embryo or fetus 5 750.90e Person G Careless or reckless driving causing miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus 2 750.90g(3) Person A Performance of procedure on live infant with intent to cause death Life 750.91 Person A Attempted murder Life Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02128'25) or House Bill 1 2 3 No. 5685 (request no. H02128'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05440'25) or House Bill No. 5684 (request no. H05440'25).